Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-467
Resistance; breach of arrest; escape.

Any person subject to this code who resists apprehension or breaks arrest or who escapes from custody or confinement shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 67, p. 1578.